Utah statutes.
69-2-4.   Administration.
The administration of the 911 emergency telephone system shall be provided by
the governing authority of the public agency establishing 911 emergency
telephone service either directly or by the appointment of employees of the
public agency as directed by the governing authority, except that any 911
emergency telephone service established by a special service district shall be
administered as set forth in Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District
Act.
